Illinois, session 104th, SB2931.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Decennial Committees on Local Government 5Efficiency Act is amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 70/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Governing board" means the governing body of a 9governmental unit. If the governmental unit is a road 10district, then "governing board" means the governing body of 11the road district, as provided in Division 1 of Article 6 of 12the Illinois Highway Code, including, but not limited to, the 13highway board of auditors, the highway commissioner of a 14township road district, the township board of trustees, the 15city council, the municipal president and board of trustees, 16or the county board, as applicable. 17    "Governmental unit" means all entities that levy taxes and 18are also units of local government, as defined in Section 1 of 19Article VII of the Illinois Constitution, except 20municipalities and counties. "Governmental unit" does not 21include a fire protection district established under the Fire 22Protection District Act. 23(Source: P.A. 102-1088, eff. 6-10-22; 102-1136, eff. 2-10-23.)